Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.110

Seal of court—Extent of process.

The municipal court shall have a seal which shall be the vignette of George Washington, with the words "Seal of The Municipal Court of . . . . . . (name of city), State of Washington," surrounding the vignette. All process from such court runs throughout the state. The supreme court may determine by rule what process must be issued under seal.

[ 1999 c 152 s 3; 1965 c 7 s 35.20.110. Prior: 1955 c 290 s 11.]